Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
APPLICABILITY TO HAWAII GUARD, VOLUNTEER PERSONNEL

AND PUBLIC
BOARD MEMBERS

A. Hawaii
Guard

§386-161 Who entitled to compensation.
If a member of the Hawaii national guard or Hawaii state defense force suffers
a personal injury arising out of and in the performance of the member's duty
therein, compensation shall be paid to the member or the member's dependents by
the State for such injury in the manner and in the amounts provided for in this
chapter; provided that if in any case arising after May 10, 1951, any such
member or the member's dependents receive compensation from the federal
government by reason of such injury, the amount of the compensation shall be
deducted from the amount which may thereafter become due from the State. [L
1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-150; HRS §386-161; gen ch 1985; am L 1988, c
135, §1]

Case Notes

Does not exclude members of the Hawaii National Guard from
receiving benefits under state workers' compensation because the members were
on federal active duty. 72 H. 157, 809 P.2d 1136 (1991).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next